Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 15 Protection of Trees and Plants Generally

2-15-1.
Registration of wood cutting operations.

No person, firm or corporation, or any authorized agent of that person, firm or corporation, shall cut or saw standing or growing trees, shrubs or vegetation for commercial forest products, other than for the owner’s own domestic use, unless the person,
firm or corporation is registered as a woods operator with the department of environmental management. Application for a registration certificate shall be made, in writing, on or after July 1 of each year on forms prepared by the department
of environmental management accompanied by a fee as authorized by regulation in §

2-10-3

.1 for each certificate, and all registration certificates shall expire on June 30 of the year following their issuance. Funds collected from registration fees as provided in this section shall be deposited within the
state forestry fund as provided for in §

2-10-3

.

History of Section. G.L. 1938, ch. 281, § 27; P.L. 1932, ch. 1928, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 8; G.L., ch. 223, § 11, as redesignated by P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 5.

2-15-2.
Reports to department — Suspensions.

Before any person, firm or corporation cuts or saws, as provided in this chapter, he or she shall at least five (5) days prior to the cutting or sawing notify the department of environmental management, on forms prepared by the department, of the location
of the area and/or property. The five (5) day notice contained in this section may be reduced to any length of time, including a complete waiver of the five (5) day notice by the department, if in the discretion of the department the
reduction is warranted. Failure to give the required notice is considered sufficient cause to suspend a registration certificate for a period not exceeding thirty (30) days. No suspension becomes effective unless the person, firm or
corporation which is alleged to have failed to give the required notice has been notified of the alleged failure and has also had an opportunity to be heard. Any person, firm, or corporation, or any authorized agent of any person,
firm or corporation shall utilize best management practices while harvesting trees as provided for in this chapter. Administrative fees for the filing of five (5) day notices shall be collected as provided for in §

2-10-3

.1 and deposited within the state forestry fund as provided for in §

2-10-3

.

History of Section. G.L. 1938, ch. 281, § 27; P.L. 1932, ch. 1928, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 8; G.L., ch. 223, § 11, as redesignated by P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 5.

2-15-3.
Violations.

Any person, firm or corporation or agent who cuts or saws standing or growing trees, shrubs, or vegetation for commercial forest products from any location without first receiving a registration certificate shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section. G.L. 1938, ch. 281, § 27; P.L. 1932, ch. 1928, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 8; G.L., ch. 223, § 11, as redesignated by P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 276, § 1.

2-15-4.
Exemptions from §§ 2-15-1 — 2-15-3.

The provisions of §§

2-15-1

—

2-15-3

shall not be construed to mean the cutting of shade trees or shrubs, or the cutting or sawing on single holdings of less than five (5) acres or to woodland owners who cut or saw, for sale to others, no more than five
thousand (5,000) board feet or twenty-five (25) cords of the items described in §

2-15-1

in any one registration year.

History of Section. G.L. 1938, ch. 281, § 27; P.L. 1932, ch. 1928, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 8; G.L., ch. 223, § 11, as redesignated by P.L. 1940, ch. 914, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 5.

2-15-5.
Removal of injurious plants.

The tree warden, the department of transportation, the department of environmental management or the park commission of any town or city or any state agency, may cause to be removed any trees or other plants within the limits of public highways or grounds
under their respective jurisdiction, that are injurious plants or are obnoxious as hosts of insects or fungus pests. Any tree removed for any reason except for interference with public health or safety, within the limits of public
highways shall be replaced by the state agency removing the tree as soon as weather conditions permit.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-5

; P.L. 1983, ch. 129, § 1.

2-15-6.
Injuries to trees and shrubs prohibited.

No person shall, without the consent of the tree warden, the department of transportation, the department of environmental management, or the park commission of any town or city use climbing spurs for the purpose of climbing ornamental or shade trees,
and no person or agent of a firm or corporation shall remove, cut down, prune, wilfully injure, or deface any shrub or tree within the limits of any public way or grounds without the written permission of the tree warden, or the
department of transportation, or the department of environmental management, or the park commission of any town or city.

Any person, firm or corporation removing or cutting down a tree located along a state or municipal highway shall replace the tree with a hardy young tree of a similar kind in the same general location of the tree cut down or removed.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-6

; P.L. 1987, ch. 333, § 1.

2-15-7.
Throwing of debris prohibited.

No person, or agent of a firm or corporation, shall:

Deposit or throw any advertisement within the limits of any public way or grounds, or upon private premises or property, unless the advertisement is left at the door of the residence or place of business of the occupant of the premises or property;

Throw, dump, or deposit or cause to be thrown, dumped, or deposited bottles, glass, crockery, cans, scrap metal, junk, paper, garbage, old automobiles or parts, refuse of whatever nature, or any noxious thing on the public highway or within the limits
of the highway right-of-way, or on lands or waters adjoining a public highway, without the consent of the owners of those lands or waters; or

Throw, dump, or deposit or cause to be thrown, dumped, or deposited refuse or noxious things over the sides or approaches of any bridge or culvert into any stream or watercourse.

The tree warden, department of transportation, the department of environmental management, or the park commission of any town or city, as the case may be, may provide suitable locations equipped with proper fireplaces on the roadside of any public highway
or on other public grounds under their jurisdiction for the building of fires, and equipped with trash cans for the deposit of rubbish or debris, the use of these locations and fireplaces to be subject to proper regulations. The
fireplaces and the regulations governing their use shall meet with the approval of the director of environmental management.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Any violation shall be heard by the traffic tribunal in accordance with §

31-41.1-6

.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 8; P.L. 1953, ch. 3221, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-7

; P.L. 1980, ch. 153, § 2.

2-15-8.
Permits for cutting or removal of plants or debris — Replacement of damaged or removed trees.

Whenever any person, firm or corporation other than a tree warden or his or her deputy, or an authorized agent of the department of transportation, or an authorized agent of the department of environmental management, or an authorized agent of the park
commission of any town or city desires the cutting or removal, in whole or in part, of any public shrub or ornamental or shade tree, or the burning of any rubbish or debris upon any public highway or in any park or public grounds,
that person, firm or corporation shall apply in writing to the tree warden or the department of transportation, the department of environmental management, or the park commission of any town or city, as the case may be, for permission
to do the cutting, removing or burning and shall obtain a written permit before the cutting, removing or burning shall commence.

When the application is made for the cutting or removal of trees along any public highway for the purpose of moving, constructing or demolishing any building, the permit shall contain a provision that the applicant shall replace any trees that are removed
or in the opinion of the issuer are substantially damaged in the process at his or her own expense and file a bond in an amount and with surety suitable to the issuer of the permit to assure performance of the same. The sum of
the diameter of the replacement trees shall be substantially equivalent to the sum of the diameters of the trees which were cut or removed, and shall be planted within the immediate community area.

Any person, firm, corporation or governmental entity that removes or substantially damages, in whole or in part, any tree on public grounds shall replace the tree with a substantially equivalent tree or trees, the sum of the diameters of which are equal
to twice that removed or damaged, in the immediate vicinity of the tree removed or damaged. This subsection does not apply to a public utility or its authorized agent when the work being performed is in accordance with a written
tree trimming and tree replacement program filed with and approved by the tree warden in the municipality where the work is being done or by the state forester for work to be performed on state land and in municipalities that do
not have functioning tree wardens.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-8

; P.L. 1979, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 331, § 1.

2-15-9.
Control of injurious gases.

No person, firm or corporation owning or using or having control or charge of gas or other substance shall knowingly permit that gas or other substance to come in contact with the soil surrounding the roots of any tree, shrub or plant in any public highway
or on any public grounds, under the jurisdiction of the tree warden, or the department of transportation, the department of environmental management, or the park commission of any town or city in any manner that shall injure, kill
or destroy the tree, shrub or plant.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-9

.

2-15-10.
Control of injurious liquids.

No person, firm or corporation shall cause, authorize or permit any brine water, oil, liquid dye, or other substance deleterious to plant life to lie, leak, pour, flow or drip on or into the soil about the base of a tree, shrub or plant in any public
highway or on any public land under the jurisdiction of the tree warden, or the department of transportation, the department of environmental management, or the park commission of any town or city.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-10

.

2-15-11.
Penalty for violations of §§ 2-15-6, 2-15-8, 2-15-9, and 2-15-10.

Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of §§

2-15-6

,

2-15-8

,

2-15-9

, or

2-15-10

, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

The director of the department of environmental management has the authority to order anyone convicted of violating §

2-15-8

or any governmental entity which the director determines violated §

2-15-8

to plant a replacement tree or trees, the sum of the diameters of which are equal to twice that removed or damaged, in the immediate vicinity of the tree removed.

History of Section.
P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 12; P.L. 1976, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 153, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 331, § 1.

2-15-12.
Plants for taking of which permits are required.

No person, firm or corporation shall dig up, pull up or take from the land of another or from any public domain, the whole or any part of any trailing arbutus (epigea repens), American holly (ilex opaca), white pine, red cedar, hemlock or other coniferous
trees, or any black alder (ilex verticillata), any inkberry (ilex glabra), any flowering dogwood (cornus florida), any mountain laurel (kalmia latifolia), any great rhododendron (rhododendron maximia), or any ground pine (lycopodium
obscurum), or any trailing Christmas greens (lycopodium complanatum), or any sea lavender (limonium carolinianum), without having in his or her possession a permit to dig up, pull up or take those plants signed by the owner of the
land, or by his or her authorized agent.

History of Section. P.L. 1939, ch. 735, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-12

; P.L. 1991, ch. 32, § 1.

2-15-13.
Transportation of contraband plants.

No person, firm or corporation shall carry or transport or cause to be carried or transported or cause to be carried or transported by others, or by a common carrier, within the state of Rhode Island, any of the plants or parts of plants mentioned in
§

2-15-12

unless he or she has first obtained a written permit to take the plants signed by the owner of the land or by his or her authorized agent. No provision of this section is to be construed to apply to any shrub, tree or
plant in transit to or from or growing in any commercial nursery.

History of Section. P.L. 1939, ch. 735, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-13

.

2-15-14.
Plants as prima facie evidence of violations.

The presence in transit upon a public highway, or in the possession of a common carrier, of plants or parts of plants mentioned in §

2-15-12

, not accompanied by a proper and valid permit is prima facie evidence of the violation of the provisions of §§

2-15-12

—

2-15-17

by the possessor, or if in the hands of a common carrier or other transporting agent, by the consignor of those plants or parts of plants.

History of Section. P.L. 1939, ch. 735, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-14

.

2-15-15.
Arrest and prosecution of violators.

Any police officer, sheriff or any employee of the department of environmental management having police powers may arrest a violator or violators of §§

2-15-12

—

2-15-17

and cause him or her or them to be prosecuted before the proper court.

History of Section. P.L. 1939, ch. 735, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-15

.

2-15-16.
Penalty for violations of §§ 2-15-12 — 2-15-17.

Any person convicted of violating the provisions of §§

2-15-12

—

2-15-17

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

History of Section. P.L. 1939, ch. 735, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-16

.

2-15-17.
Powers of department of environmental management preserved.

No provision of §§

2-15-12

—

2-15-17

shall be construed to divest the department of environmental management of any power or powers vested in that department.

History of Section. P.L. 1939, ch. 735, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-15-17

.